Utah statutes.
73-2-13.   Attorney general and county attorneys to counsel.

In all matters requiring legal advice in the performance of his duties and the prosecution or defense of any action growing out of the performance of his duties, the attorney general or county attorney of the county in which any legal question arises, shall be the legal advisers of the state engineer, and they are hereby required to perform any and all legal services required of them by him without other compensation than their salaries.



Amended by Chapter 186, 1971 General Session

